tr: Örnek Test: Kan; Nefes; Temas termometresi; Temassız termometre; Tükürük; Dışkı; Dışkı testi; Çubuk; İdrar; Diğer
ro-RO: Probe pentru analize: Sânge; Respirație; Termometru de contact; Termometru cu teledetecție; Salivă; Scaun; Test de scaun; Recoltor; Urină; Altele
nl: Testmonster: Bloed; Adem; Contactthermometer; Thermometer met afstandsdetectie; Speeksel; Ontlasting; Ontlastingstest; Wattenstokje; Urine; Andere
ko: 테스트 샘플: 피; 호흡; 접촉식 온도계; 원격 감지 온도계; 타액; 대변; 대변 검사; 스왑; 소변; 기타
zh-TW: 檢測樣品: 血; 呼吸; 接觸式溫度計; 遙感溫度計; 唾液; 糞便; 糞便檢測; 拭子; 尿液; 其他
fr: Échantillon de test: Sang; Haleine; Thermomètre à contact; Thermomètre de télédétection; Salive; Selles; Test de selles; Écouvillon; Urine; Autre
lt-LT: Tyrimo mėginys: Kraujas; Kvėpavimas; Kontaktinis termometras; Nuotolinis termometras; Seilės; Išmatos; Išmatų tyrimas; Tepinėlis; Šlapimas; Kita
th: ตัวอย่างการทดสอบ: เลือด; ลมหายใจ; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์แบบสัมผัส; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์ตรวจจับระยะไกล; น้ำลาย; สตูล; การทดสอบอุจจาระ; ก้านสำลี; ปัสสาวะ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Testni vzorec: Kri; Dih; Kontaktni termometer; Termometer z daljinskim zaznavanjem; Slina; Blato; Test blata; Bris; Urin; Drugo
ru: Тестовый образец: Кровь; Дыхание; Контактный термометр; Дистанционный термометр; Слюна; Кал; Анализ кала; Тампон; Моча; Другой
de: Testprobe: Blut; Atem; Kontaktthermometer; Fernthermometer; Speichel; Stuhl; Stuhltest; Tupfer; Urin; Sonstiges
pl: Próbka testowa: Krew; Oddech; Termometr stykowy; Termometr z teledetekcją; Ślina; Stolec; Badanie stolca; Wymaz; Mocz; Inne
pt-BR: Amostra de teste: Sangue; Respiração; Termômetro de contato; Termômetro de sensoriamento remoto; Saliva; Amostra de fezes; Exame de fezes; Esfregão; Urina; Outro
pt-PT: Amostra de teste: Sangue; Respiração; Termómetro de contacto; Termómetro de sensoriamento remoto; Saliva; Fezes; Exame às fezes; Esfregaço; Urina; Outro
hu: Tesztminta: Vér; Lehelet; Kontakthőmérő; Távérzékeléses hőmérő; Nyál; Széklet; Székletvizsgálat; Tampon; Vizelet; Egyéb
sv: Testprov: Blod; Andning; Kontakttermometer; Fjärravkännande termometer; Saliv; Avföring; Avföringstest; Svabb; Urin; Övrigt
zh-CN: 测试样品: 血; 呼吸; 接触温度计; 遥感温度计; 唾液; 大便; 大便检测; 棉签; 尿; 其他
nb: Testprøve: Blod; Pust; Kontakttermometer; Fjernmålingstermometer; Spytt; Avføring; Avføringstest; Vattpinne; Urin; Annet
hr-HR: Uzorak za testiranje: Krv; Dah; Kontaktni termometar; Termometar s daljinskim senzorom; Slina; Stolica; Analiza stolice; Bris; Urin; Ostalo
es: Muestra de prueba: Sangre; Aliento; Termómetro de contacto; Termómetro de teledetección; Saliva; Taburete; Prueba de heces; Hisopo; Orina; Otros
sk-SK: Testovacia vzorka: Krv; Dych; Kontaktný teplomer; Teplomer s diaľkovým snímaním; Sliny; Stolica; Test stolice; Výter; Moč; Iné
ja: 検査サンプル: 血液; 呼気; 接触式温度計; 隔測温度計; 唾液; 排便; 排便検査; 綿棒; 尿; その他
fi: Testinäyte: Veri; Henkäys; Kontaktilämpömittari; Kaukokartoituslämpömittari; Sylki; Uloste; Ulostetesti; Näyte; Virtsa; Muu
en: Test sample: Blood; Breath; Contact thermometer; Remote sensing thermometer; Saliva; Stool; Stool test; Swab; Urine; Other
it: Campione per il test: Sangue; Respiro; Termometro a contatto; Termometro a rilevamento remoto; Saliva; Sgabello; Esame delle feci; Tampone; Urina; Altro
da: Testprøve: Blod; Åndedrag; Kontakttermometer; Fjernmålingstermometer; Spyt; Afføring; Afføringstest; Vatpind; Urin; Andet
bg-BG: Тестова проба: Кръв; Дъх; Контактен термометър; Термометър с дистанционно отчитане; Слюнка; Изпражнения; Фекален тест; Тампон; Урина; Други
el: Δείγμα δοκιμής: Αίμα; Αναπνοή; Θερμόμετρο επαφής; Θερμόμετρο τηλεπισκόπησης; Σάλιο; Σκαμπό; Δοκιμή κοπράνων; Μάκτρο; Ούρο; Άλλο
cs: Testovací vzorek: Krev; Dech; Kontaktní teploměr; Teploměr s dálkovým snímáním; Sliny; Stolice; Test stolice; Výtěr; Moč; Jiné
vi: Mẫu xét nghiệm: Máu; Hơi thở; Nhiệt kế tiếp xúc; Nhiệt kế đo từ xa; Nước bọt; Phân; Xét nghiệm phân; Dịch phết; Nước tiểu; Khác